Utah statutes.
77-1-2.   Criminal procedure prescribed.

The procedure in criminal cases shall be as prescribed in this title, the Rules of Criminal Procedure, and such further rules as may be adopted by the Supreme Court of Utah.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

